Massachusetts, session 194th, H1160.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6 of chapter 151A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(y) service performed by a nonresident alien for the period the nonresident alien is
temporarily present in the United States as a nonimmigrant under subparagraph (F ), (J ), (M ) or
(Q ) of section 101(a)(15) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, codified as 8 U.S.C. section
1101, and which is performed to carry out the purpose specified in said subparagraph (F), (J),
(M) or (Q), as the case may be .
SECTION 2. The definition of “Covered individual” in section 1 of chapter 175M of the
General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- A
of 2

nonresident alien shall not be a “covered individual” for the period the nonresident alien is
temporarily present in the United States as a nonimmigrant under subparagraph (F), (J), (M) or
(Q) of section 101(a)(15) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, codified as 8 U.S.C. section
1101, for service performed to carry out the purpose specified in said subparagraph (F), (J), (M)
or (Q), as the case may be.
of 2